src/pers-myv-morph.txt
! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !


LEXICON Pers_Pronouns1
< 0:н "+Nom":0 "@D.TNUM.PL@" > kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:н 0:ь "+Nom":0 "@D.TNUM.SG@" > kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:н 0:с 0:ь "+Intensive":0 > PersPron_Minsy ;
< 0:н 0:ь "+PxSg1":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@N.TPERS.1@"  "@C.TNUM@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:ь "+NoPoss":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@N.TPERS.2@"  "@C.TNUM@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg2":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@""@N.TPERS.2@" "@C.TNUM@" > Tenses1 ;

< 0:н 0:з 0:э "+PxSg3":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@N.TPERS.3@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:е 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@""@N.TPERS.1@" "@C.TNUM@" > lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@""@N.TPERS.2@"  "@C.TNUM@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@""@N.TPERS.3@"  "@C.TNUM@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!PROBLEM 2009-09-16 why does nstY4 have the Y4

!+Refl+Gen+Pron:%>О1нсе PersPron_Gen ;
+Dial+Refl+LV+Gen+Pron:%>О1нси PersPron_Gen ;


!2! Pers_Pronouns1_es ;
!2!+Indet+Gen+Det:нсе CXPossPX1 ;
+Refl+Abe:%>О1нстеме PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Abl:%>О1нстеде PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Comp:%>О1нсешка PossPX1 ;
+Refl+DatCx:%>О1нсте PossPX1 ;

< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь "+Gen":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.2@"> kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:з 0:о "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg3":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.3@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;

+Abl:%>О1нде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Abl+Abl:%>О1ндеде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Abl+Gen+Abl:%>О1нденде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+DatCx:не  PersPron_PossPX ;
+Ill:ньзэ  PersPron_PossPX ;
< 0:н 0:ь 0:к 0:с "+Tra":0 "@P.LV.ON@" > osh-PersPron_PossPX ; 
< 0:н 0:ь 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:к 0:с "+Tra":0 "+LV":0 "+Tra":0"@P.LV.ON@" > osh-PersPron_PossPX ; 

+Abl:%>О1нде PersPron_Oblique ; 
+Abe:%>О1нтеме PersPron_Oblique ;
+Comp:%>О1ньшка PersPron_Oblique ;
+Ela:%>О1ньстэ PersPron_Oblique ;
+Ine:%>О1ньсэ PersPron_Oblique ; 
+Prl:%>О1ньга PersPron_Oblique ;

!!!!
!
LEXICON PersPron_Minsy
+Nom: osh-Tenses1 ;
!!!< "@N.TPERS.1@" "@N.TPERS.2@" "@N.TPERS.3@" "@C.TNUM@"> PersPron_Gen ;
+DatCx:%>те PersPron_PossPX ;
+Abl+Abl:%>теде PersPron_PossPX ;
+Abl:%>О1де PersPron_PossPX ;
+Prl:%>Г2а PersPron_Oblique ;
+LV+Comp:%>О1шка PersPron_Oblique ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 PersPron_Oblique ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:к 0:с  "+LV":0 "+Tra":0 "@P.LV.ON@" > osh-PersPron_PossPX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:м "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:ь "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:т 0:Ь2 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+PxSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!these just go onto the clitics
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;

LEXICON PersPron_Gen
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:м "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:ь "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:т 0:Ь2 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+PxSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!these just go onto the clitics
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;

LEXICON PersPron_Oblique
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:м "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:Ь2 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:Ь2 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+PxSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;


!!Copied from "PossPX1"
!!These PossPXs are applied after Obl cases
!!
LEXICON PersPron_PossPX 
< 0:">" 0:н 0:Ь2 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:Ь2 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+PxSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;

LEXICON osh-PersPron_PossPX 
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:Ь2 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:Ь2 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+PxSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;


!LEXICON PersPron_PossPX-for-transl
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:н 0:Ь2 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:т 0:Ь2 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+PxSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+PxPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:н 0:к "+PxPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:с 0:т  "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;
!< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+PxPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;


!!!This is preceded by a pronoun in the "+Gen"
LEXICON kal-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kal-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N: kal-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON lak-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> lak-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N:  lak-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON kit-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kit-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N:  kit-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N: kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;



LEXICON kal-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          kal-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON lak-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          lak-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON kit-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          kit-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON kal-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+DatCx:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+DatCx":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>О1нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>О1в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Tra:%>О1кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON lak-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>О1шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+DatCx:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+DatCx":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>О1нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>О1в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Tra:%>О1кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
